dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- অকৃত্রিম; অকৃত্রিম -->
    <pardef n="অকৃত্রিম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বেপরোয়া; বেপরোয়া -->
    <pardef n="বেপরোয়া__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রভাবিত; প্রভাবিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রভাবিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অর্থনৈতিক; অর্থনৈতিক -->
    <pardef n="অর্থনৈতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অর্থহীন; অর্থহীন -->
    <pardef n="অর্থহীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঝুলন্ত; ঝুলন্ত -->
    <pardef n="ঝুলন্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- খুব; খুব -->
    <pardef n="খুব__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘন; ঘন -->
    <pardef n="ঘন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অভ্যন্তরীণ; অভ্যন্তরীণ -->
    <pardef n="অভ্যন্তরীণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জীবিত; জীবিত -->
    <pardef n="জীবিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘরোয়া; ঘরোয়া -->
    <pardef n="ঘরোয়া__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মূল্যবান; মূল্যবান -->
    <pardef n="মূল্যবান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কাল; কাল -->
    <pardef n="কাল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আহত; আহত -->
    <pardef n="আহত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ফলপ্রসূ; ফলপ্রসূ -->
    <pardef n="ফলপ্রসূ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আণবিক; আণবিক -->
    <pardef n="আণবিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মোট; মোট -->
    <pardef n="মোট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- খানেক; খানেক -->
    <pardef n="খানেক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সর্বনিম্ন; সর্বনিম্ন -->
    <pardef n="সর্বনিম্ন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিস্তারিত; বিস্তারিত -->
    <pardef n="বিস্তারিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নির্ভরযোগ্য; নির্ভরযোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="নির্ভরযোগ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আকর্ষণীয়; আকর্ষণীয় -->
    <pardef n="আকর্ষণীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রশস্ত; প্রশস্ত -->
    <pardef n="প্রশস্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একই; একই -->
    <pardef n="একই__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শিক্ষিত; শিক্ষিত -->
    <pardef n="শিক্ষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দেরিতে; দেরিতে -->
    <pardef n="দেরিতে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শাসক; শাসক -->
    <pardef n="শাসক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুবর্ণ; সুবর্ণ -->
    <pardef n="সুবর্ণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিমূর্ত; বিমূর্ত -->
    <pardef n="বিমূর্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বাণিজ্যিক; বাণিজ্যিক -->
    <pardef n="বাণিজ্যিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বাংলা; বাংলা -->
    <pardef n="বাংলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বলিষ্ঠতম; বলিষ্ঠ -->
    <pardef n="বলিষ্ঠ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জনগণ; জনগণ -->
    <pardef n="জনগণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমৃদ্ধ; সমৃদ্ধ -->
    <pardef n="সমৃদ্ধ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নরম; নরম -->
    <pardef n="নরম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একক; একক -->
    <pardef n="একক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কথিত; কথিত -->
    <pardef n="কথিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সঠিক; সঠিক -->
    <pardef n="সঠিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শহুরে; শহুরে -->
    <pardef n="শহুরে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কাল্পনিক; কাল্পনিক -->
    <pardef n="কাল্পনিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিকট; বিকট -->
    <pardef n="বিকট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ষষ্ঠ; ষষ্ঠ -->
    <pardef n="ষষ্ঠ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মানবিক; মানবিক -->
    <pardef n="মানবিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জার্মান; জার্মান -->
    <pardef n="জার্মান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উত্তর; উত্তর -->
    <pardef n="উত্তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="অকৃত্রিম"><i>অকৃত্রিম</i><par n="অকৃত্রিম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বেপরোয়া"><i>বেপরোয়া</i><par n="বেপরোয়া__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রভাবিত"><i>প্রভাবিত</i><par n="প্রভাবিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্থনৈতিক"><i>অর্থনৈতিক</i><par n="অর্থনৈতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্থহীন"><i>অর্থহীন</i><par n="অর্থহীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঝুলন্ত"><i>ঝুলন্ত</i><par n="ঝুলন্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খুব"><i>খুব</i><par n="খুব__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘন"><i>ঘন</i><par n="ঘন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অভ্যন্তরীণ"><i>অভ্যন্তরীণ</i><par n="অভ্যন্তরীণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জীবিত"><i>জীবিত</i><par n="জীবিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘরোয়া"><i>ঘরোয়া</i><par n="ঘরোয়া__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মূল্যবান"><i>মূল্যবান</i><par n="মূল্যবান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কাল"><i>কাল</i><par n="কাল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আহত"><i>আহত</i><par n="আহত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ফলপ্রসূ"><i>ফলপ্রসূ</i><par n="ফলপ্রসূ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আণবিক"><i>আণবিক</i><par n="আণবিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মোট"><i>মোট</i><par n="মোট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খানেক"><i>খানেক</i><par n="খানেক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্বনিম্ন"><i>সর্বনিম্ন</i><par n="সর্বনিম্ন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিস্তারিত"><i>বিস্তারিত</i><par n="বিস্তারিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্ভরযোগ্য"><i>নির্ভরযোগ্য</i><par n="নির্ভরযোগ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আকর্ষণীয়"><i>আকর্ষণীয়</i><par n="আকর্ষণীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রশস্ত"><i>প্রশস্ত</i><par n="প্রশস্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একই"><i>একই</i><par n="একই__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শিক্ষিত"><i>শিক্ষিত</i><par n="শিক্ষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দেরিতে"><i>দেরিতে</i><par n="দেরিতে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শাসক"><i>শাসক</i><par n="শাসক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুবর্ণ"><i>সুবর্ণ</i><par n="সুবর্ণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিমূর্ত"><i>বিমূর্ত</i><par n="বিমূর্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাণিজ্যিক"><i>বাণিজ্যিক</i><par n="বাণিজ্যিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাংলা"><i>বাংলা</i><par n="বাংলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বলিষ্ঠতম"><i>বলিষ্ঠ</i><par n="বলিষ্ঠ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জনগণ"><i>জনগণ</i><par n="জনগণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমৃদ্ধ"><i>সমৃদ্ধ</i><par n="সমৃদ্ধ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নরম"><i>নরম</i><par n="নরম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একক"><i>একক</i><par n="একক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কথিত"><i>কথিত</i><par n="কথিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সঠিক"><i>সঠিক</i><par n="সঠিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শহুরে"><i>শহুরে</i><par n="শহুরে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কাল্পনিক"><i>কাল্পনিক</i><par n="কাল্পনিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিকট"><i>বিকট</i><par n="বিকট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ষষ্ঠ"><i>ষষ্ঠ</i><par n="ষষ্ঠ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মানবিক"><i>মানবিক</i><par n="মানবিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জার্মান"><i>জার্মান</i><par n="জার্মান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উত্তর"><i>উত্তর</i><par n="উত্তর__adj"/></e>
